Maine, session 132, LD456.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to amend the laws related to the expansion of public defense services
in the State and the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services.
Page 1 - 132LR1558(01)